Iowa, session 2025-2026, SSB3189.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 11 TLSB 5009XG (4) 91 sc/ns S.F. _____ H.F. _____ DIVISION I 1 FY 2026-2027 APPROPRIATIONS 2 Section 1. DEPARTMENT OF ADMINISTRATIVE SERVICES. 3 1. There is appropriated from the general fund of the state 4 to the department of administrative services for the fiscal 5 year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, the 6 following amounts, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be 7 used for the purposes designated: 8 a. For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 9 purposes: 10 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 3,602,306 11 b. For the payment of utility costs: 12 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 4,487,598 13 Notwithstanding section 8.33 , moneys appropriated 14 for utility costs in this lettered paragraph that remain 15 unencumbered or unobligated at the close of the fiscal year 16 shall not revert but shall remain available for expenditure 17 for the purposes designated until the close of the succeeding 18 fiscal year. 19 c. For Terrace Hill operations: 20 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 460,884 21 d. For state library services: 22 (1) For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 23 purposes: 24 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,626,613 25 (2) For the enrich Iowa program established under section 26 8A.209 : 27 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,464,823 28 e. (1) For support of the stateâs historical resources: 29 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 3,804,774 30 (2) The department shall coordinate historical and cultural 31 activities with the tourism office of the economic development 32 authority to promote attendance at the state historical 33 building and at the stateâs historic sites. 34 f. For administration and support of the stateâs historic 35 -1- LSB 5009XG (4) 91 sc/ns 1/ 19 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ sites: 1 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 425,751 2 2. Any moneys and premiums collected by the department 3 for workersâ compensation shall be segregated into a separate 4 workersâ compensation fund in the state treasury to be used 5 for payment of state employeesâ workersâ compensation claims 6 and administrative costs. Notwithstanding section 8.33 , 7 unencumbered or unobligated moneys remaining in this workersâ 8 compensation fund at the end of the fiscal year shall not 9 revert but shall remain available for expenditure for purposes 10 of the fund in subsequent fiscal years. 11 Sec. 2. DEPARTMENT OF ADMINISTRATIVE SERVICES ââ 12 REVOLVING FUNDS. There is appropriated to the department of 13 administrative services for the fiscal year beginning July 14 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, from the revolving funds 15 designated in chapter 8A and from internal service funds 16 created by the department such amounts as the department deems 17 necessary for the operation of the department consistent with 18 the requirements of chapter 8A . 19 Sec. 3. DEPARTMENT OF ADMINISTRATIVE SERVICES ââ STATE 20 EMPLOYEE HEALTH INSURANCE ADMINISTRATION CHARGE. For the 21 fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, 22 the monthly per contract administrative charge which may be 23 assessed by the department of administrative services shall be 24 $2.00 per contract on all health insurance plans administered 25 by the department. 26 Sec. 4. AUDITOR OF STATE. 27 1. There is appropriated from the general fund of the state 28 to the office of the auditor of state for the fiscal year 29 beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, the following 30 amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the 31 purposes designated: 32 For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 33 purposes: 34 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,002,686 35 -2- LSB 5009XG (4) 91 sc/ns 2/ 19 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ 2. The auditor of state may retain additional full-time 1 equivalent positions as is reasonable and necessary to 2 perform governmental subdivision audits which are reimbursable 3 pursuant to section 11.20 or 11.21 , to perform audits which are 4 requested by and reimbursable from the federal government, and 5 to perform work requested by and reimbursable from departments 6 or agencies pursuant to section 11.5A or 11.5B . The auditor 7 of state shall notify the department of management, the 8 legislative fiscal committee, and the legislative services 9 agency of the additional full-time equivalent positions 10 retained. 11 3. The auditor of state shall allocate moneys from the 12 appropriation in this section solely for audit work related to 13 the annual comprehensive financial report, federally required 14 audits, and investigations of embezzlement, theft, or other 15 significant financial irregularities until the audit of the 16 annual comprehensive financial report is complete. 17 Sec. 5. IOWA ETHICS AND CAMPAIGN DISCLOSURE BOARD. There 18 is appropriated from the general fund of the state to the 19 Iowa ethics and campaign disclosure board for the fiscal year 20 beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, the following 21 amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the 22 purposes designated: 23 For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 24 purposes: 25 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,045,432 26 Sec. 6. GOVERNOR AND LIEUTENANT GOVERNOR. There is 27 appropriated from the general fund of the state to the offices 28 of the governor and the lieutenant governor for the fiscal year 29 beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, the following 30 amounts, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the 31 purposes designated: 32 1. GENERAL OFFICE 33 For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 34 purposes: 35 -3- LSB 5009XG (4) 91 sc/ns 3/ 19 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,864,932 1 2. TERRACE HILL QUARTERS 2 For the governorâs quarters at Terrace Hill, including 3 salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous purposes: 4 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 144,222 5 Sec. 7. DEPARTMENT OF INSPECTIONS, APPEALS, AND 6 LICENSING. There is appropriated from the general fund of the 7 state to the department of inspections, appeals, and licensing 8 for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 9 30, 2027, the following amounts, or so much thereof as is 10 necessary, to be used for the purposes designated: 11 1. ADMINISTRATION DIVISION 12 For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 13 purposes: 14 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 808,285 15 2. ADMINISTRATIVE HEARINGS DIVISION 16 For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 17 purposes: 18 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 654,983 19 3. INVESTIGATIONS 20 a. For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 21 purposes: 22 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,769,231 23 b. By December 1, 2026, the department shall submit a 24 report to the general assembly concerning the departmentâs 25 activities relative to fraud in public assistance programs for 26 the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 27 2026. The report must include but is not limited to a summary 28 of the number of cases investigated, case outcomes, overpayment 29 dollars identified, amount of cost avoidance, and actual 30 dollars recovered. 31 4. HEALTH FACILITIES 32 a. For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 33 purposes: 34 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 6,206,128 35 -4- LSB 5009XG (4) 91 sc/ns 4/ 19 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ b. The department shall make all of the following 1 information available to the public as part of the departmentâs 2 development efforts to revise the departmentâs internet site: 3 (1) The number of inspections of health facilities 4 conducted by the department annually by type of service 5 provider and type of inspection. 6 (2) The total annual operations budget for the department 7 that is associated with health facilities regulation, including 8 general fund appropriations and federal contract dollars 9 received by type of service provider inspected. 10 (3) The total number of full-time equivalent positions 11 in the department that are associated with health facilities 12 regulation, to include the number of full-time equivalent 13 positions serving in a supervisory capacity, and serving as 14 surveyors, inspectors, or monitors in the field by type of 15 service provider inspected. 16 (4) Identification of state and federal survey trends, 17 cited regulations, the scope and severity of deficiencies 18 identified, and federal and state fines assessed and collected 19 concerning nursing and assisted living facilities and programs. 20 c. It is the intent of the general assembly that the 21 department continuously solicit input from health facilities 22 regulated by the department to assess and improve the 23 departmentâs level of collaboration and to identify new 24 opportunities for cooperation. 25 5. EMPLOYMENT APPEAL BOARD 26 a. For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 27 purposes: 28 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 510,782 29 b. The employment appeal board shall be reimbursed by the 30 department for all costs associated with hearings conducted 31 under chapter 91C related to contractor registration. The 32 board may expend, in addition to the amount appropriated under 33 this subsection, additional amounts as are directly billable 34 to the department under this subsection and to retain the 35 -5- LSB 5009XG (4) 91 sc/ns 5/ 19 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ additional full-time equivalent positions as needed to conduct 1 hearings required pursuant to chapter 91C . 2 c. The employment appeal board may temporarily exceed and 3 draw more than the amount appropriated in this subsection and 4 incur a negative cash balance as long as there are receivables 5 of federal funds equal to or greater than the negative balance 6 and the amount appropriated in this subsection is not exceeded 7 at the close of the fiscal year. 8 6. IOWA OFFICE OF CIVIL RIGHTS 9 a. For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 10 purposes: 11 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,338,921 12 b. The Iowa office of civil rights may enter into a contract 13 with a nonprofit organization to provide legal assistance to 14 resolve civil rights complaints. 15 7. LABOR SERVICES 16 a. For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 17 purposes: 18 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,965,719 19 b. Notwithstanding section 8.33 , moneys appropriated in 20 this subsection that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the 21 close of the fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain 22 available for expenditure for the purposes designated until the 23 close of the succeeding fiscal year. 24 8. DIVISION OF WORKERSâ COMPENSATION 25 a. For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 26 purposes: 27 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 3,381,044 28 b. Notwithstanding section 8.33 , moneys appropriated in 29 this subsection that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the 30 close of the fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain 31 available for expenditure for the purposes designated until the 32 close of the succeeding fiscal year. 33 9. PROFESSIONAL LICENSING 34 For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 35 -6- LSB 5009XG (4) 91 sc/ns 6/ 19 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ purposes: 1 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,627,969 2 10. APPROPRIATION REALLOCATION 3 Notwithstanding section 8.39 , the department of inspections, 4 appeals, and licensing, in consultation with the department of 5 management, may reallocate moneys appropriated in this section 6 as necessary to best fulfill the needs of the department 7 of inspections, appeals, and licensing provided for in the 8 appropriation. However, the department of inspections, 9 appeals, and licensing shall not reallocate moneys appropriated 10 for labor services or the division of workersâ compensation. 11 Sec. 8. DEPARTMENT OF INSPECTIONS, APPEALS, AND LICENSING 12 ââ LICENSE OR REGISTRATION FEES. 13 1. For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending 14 June 30, 2027, the department of inspections, appeals, and 15 licensing shall collect any license or registration fees or 16 electronic transaction fees generated during the fiscal year 17 as a result of licensing and registration activities under 18 chapters 99B , 137C , 137D , and 137F . 19 2. From the fees collected by the department under this 20 section on behalf of a municipal corporation with which 21 the department has an agreement pursuant to section 137F.3 , 22 through a statewide electronic licensing system operated by 23 the department, notwithstanding section 137F.6, subsection 2 , 24 the department shall remit the amount of those fees to the 25 municipal corporation for whom the fees were collected less 26 any electronic transaction fees collected by the department to 27 enable electronic payment. 28 3. From the fees collected by the department under this 29 section, other than those fees described in subsection 2, 30 the department shall deposit the amount of $290,435 into the 31 general fund of the state prior to June 30, 2027. 32 4. From the fees collected by the department under this 33 section, other than those fees described in subsections 2 and 34 3, the department shall retain the remainder of the fees for 35 -7- LSB 5009XG (4) 91 sc/ns 7/ 19 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ the purposes of enforcing the provisions of chapters 99B , 137C , 1 137D , and 137F . Notwithstanding section 8.33 , moneys retained 2 by the department pursuant to this subsection that remain 3 unencumbered or unobligated at the close of the fiscal year 4 shall not revert but shall remain available for expenditure 5 for the purposes of enforcing the provisions of chapters 99B , 6 137C , 137D , and 137F during the succeeding fiscal year. The 7 department shall provide an annual report to the department 8 of management and the legislative services agency on fees 9 billed and collected and expenditures from the moneys retained 10 by the department in a format determined by the department 11 of management in consultation with the legislative services 12 agency. 13 Sec. 9. DEPARTMENT OF INSPECTIONS, APPEALS, AND LICENSING 14 ââ RACING AND GAMING COMMISSION ââ RACING AND GAMING 15 REGULATION. There is appropriated from the gaming regulatory 16 revolving fund created in section 99F.20 to the racing and 17 gaming commission of the department of inspections, appeals, 18 and licensing for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and 19 ending June 30, 2027, the following amount, or so much thereof 20 as is necessary, to be used for the purposes designated: 21 For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 22 purposes for regulation, administration, and enforcement of 23 pari-mutuel racetracks, excursion boat gambling, gambling 24 structure laws, sports wagering, and fantasy sports contests: 25 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 8,049,999 26 Sec. 10. DEPARTMENT OF INSPECTIONS, APPEALS, AND LICENSING 27 ââ ROAD USE TAX FUND. There is appropriated from the road 28 use tax fund created in section 312.1 to the administrative 29 hearings division of the department of inspections, appeals, 30 and licensing for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and 31 ending June 30, 2027, the following amount, or so much thereof 32 as is necessary, to be used for the purposes designated: 33 For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 34 purposes: 35 -8- LSB 5009XG (4) 91 sc/ns 8/ 19 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,623,897 1 Sec. 11. DEPARTMENT OF INSURANCE AND FINANCIAL SERVICES 2 ââ COMMERCE REVOLVING FUND. There is appropriated from the 3 commerce revolving fund created in section 546.12 to the 4 department of insurance and financial services for the fiscal 5 year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, the 6 following amounts, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be 7 used for the purposes designated: 8 1. BANKING DIVISION 9 For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 10 purposes: 11 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 14,881,690 12 2. CREDIT UNION DIVISION 13 For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 14 purposes: 15 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 3,018,710 16 3. INSURANCE DIVISION 17 a. For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 18 purposes: 19 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 11,010,719 20 b. The insurance division expenditures for examination 21 purposes may exceed the projected receipts, refunds, and 22 reimbursements, estimated pursuant to section 505.7, subsection 23 7 , including the expenditures for retention of additional 24 personnel, if the expenditures are fully reimbursable and the 25 division first does all of the following: 26 (1) Notifies the department of management, the legislative 27 services agency, and the legislative fiscal committee of the 28 need for the expenditures. 29 (2) Files with each of the entities named in subparagraph 30 (1) the legislative and regulatory justification for the 31 expenditures, along with an estimate of the expenditures. 32 Sec. 12. DEPARTMENT OF INSURANCE AND FINANCIAL SERVICES ââ 33 GENERAL FUND. There is appropriated from the general fund of 34 the state to the department of insurance and financial services 35 -9- LSB 5009XG (4) 91 sc/ns 9/ 19 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 1 2027, the following amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, 2 to be used for the purposes designated: 3 For deposit in the captive insurance regulatory and 4 supervision fund created in section 521J.12 for use as provided 5 in section 521J.12 , including salaries, support, maintenance, 6 and miscellaneous purposes: 7 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 450,000 8 Sec. 13. DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT. There is appropriated 9 from the general fund of the state to the department of 10 management for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and 11 ending June 30, 2027, the following amounts, or so much thereof 12 as is necessary, to be used for the purposes designated: 13 1. For enterprise resource planning, providing for a 14 salary model administrator, conducting performance audits, 15 the departmentâs LEAN process, and criminal and juvenile 16 justice planning; and for salaries, support, maintenance, and 17 miscellaneous purposes: 18 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 3,666,154 19 2. a. For the division of information technology; and for 20 salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous purposes: 21 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 4,421,887 22 b. Of the moneys appropriated in this subsection, $325,000 23 is allocated to providing cybersecurity services to local 24 governments. 25 Sec. 14. DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT ââ INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY 26 ââ REVOLVING AND INTERNAL FUNDS. 27 1. There is appropriated to the department of management 28 for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 29 30, 2027, from the revolving funds designated in chapter 8, 30 subchapter XI , and from internal service funds created under 31 section 8.92 , such amounts as the department deems necessary 32 for the operation of the department pursuant to and consistent 33 with the requirements of chapter 8, subchapter XI . 34 2. a. Notwithstanding section 321A.3, subsection 1 , for the 35 -10- LSB 5009XG (4) 91 sc/ns 10/ 19 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, 1 the first $750,000 collected and transferred to the treasurer 2 of state with respect to the fees for transactions involving 3 the furnishing of a certified abstract of a vehicle operating 4 record under section 321A.3, subsection 1 , shall be transferred 5 to the IowAccess revolving fund created in section 8.90 for 6 the purposes of developing, implementing, maintaining, and 7 expanding electronic access to government records as provided 8 by law. 9 b. All fees collected with respect to transactions 10 involving IowAccess shall be deposited in the IowAccess 11 revolving fund created under section 8.90 and shall be used 12 only for the support of IowAccess projects. 13 Sec. 15. DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT ââ ROAD USE TAX 14 FUND. There is appropriated from the road use tax fund created 15 in section 312.1 to the department of management for the fiscal 16 year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, the 17 following amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be 18 used for the purposes designated: 19 For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 20 purposes: 21 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 56,000 22 Sec. 16. IPERS ââ GENERAL OFFICE. There is appropriated 23 from the Iowa public employeesâ retirement fund created in 24 section 97B.7 to the Iowa public employeesâ retirement system 25 for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 26 2027, the following amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, 27 to be used for the purposes designated: 28 For salaries, support, maintenance, and other operational 29 purposes to pay the costs of the Iowa public employeesâ 30 retirement system: 31 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 26,330,702 32 Sec. 17. IOWA PUBLIC INFORMATION BOARD. There is 33 appropriated from the general fund of the state to the Iowa 34 public information board for the fiscal year beginning July 35 -11- LSB 5009XG (4) 91 sc/ns 11/ 19 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, the following amount, or 1 so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the purposes 2 designated: 3 For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 4 purposes: 5 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 467,227 6 Sec. 18. DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE. 7 1. There is appropriated from the general fund of the state 8 to the department of revenue for the fiscal year beginning July 9 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, the following amount, or 10 so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the purposes 11 designated: 12 a. For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 13 purposes: 14 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 15,378,678 15 b. From the moneys appropriated in this subsection, the 16 department shall use $400,000 to pay the direct costs of 17 compliance related to the collection and distribution of local 18 sales and services taxes imposed pursuant to chapter 423B . 19 2. The director of revenue shall prepare and issue a state 20 appraisal manual and the revisions to the state appraisal 21 manual as provided in section 421.17, subsection 17 , without 22 cost to a city or county. 23 Sec. 19. DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE ââ MOTOR VEHICLE FUEL TAX 24 FUND. There is appropriated from the motor vehicle fuel tax 25 fund created pursuant to section 452A.77 to the department of 26 revenue for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending 27 June 30, 2027, the following amount, or so much thereof as is 28 necessary, to be used for the purposes designated: 29 For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 30 purposes, and for administration and enforcement of the 31 provisions of chapter 452A and the motor vehicle fuel tax 32 program: 33 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,305,775 34 Sec. 20. SECRETARY OF STATE. There is appropriated from 35 -12- LSB 5009XG (4) 91 sc/ns 12/ 19 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ the general fund of the state to the office of the secretary of 1 state for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending 2 June 30, 2027, the following amounts, or so much thereof as is 3 necessary, to be used for the purposes designated: 4 1. ADMINISTRATION AND ELECTIONS 5 a. For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 6 purposes: 7 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,566,697 8 b. The state department or agency that provides data 9 processing services to support voter registration file 10 maintenance and storage shall provide those services without 11 charge. 12 2. BUSINESS SERVICES 13 For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 14 purposes: 15 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,568,795 16 Sec. 21. SECRETARY OF STATE ââ ADDRESS CONFIDENTIALITY 17 PROGRAM REVOLVING FUND. There is appropriated from the address 18 confidentiality program revolving fund created in section 9.8 19 to the office of the secretary of state for the fiscal year 20 beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, the following 21 amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the 22 purposes designated: 23 For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 24 purposes: 25 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 195,400 26 Sec. 22. SECRETARY OF STATE FILING FEES REFUND. 27 Notwithstanding the obligation to collect fees pursuant to the 28 provisions of section 489.122, subsection 1 , paragraphs âcâ and 29 âsâ, section 490.122, subsection 1 , paragraph âaâ, and section 30 504.113, subsection 1 , paragraphs âaâ, âcâ, âdâ, âjâ, âkâ, 31 âlâ, and âmâ, for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, the 32 secretary of state may refund these fees to the filer pursuant 33 to rules established by the secretary of state. The decision 34 of the secretary of state not to issue a refund under rules 35 -13- LSB 5009XG (4) 91 sc/ns 13/ 19 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ established by the secretary of state is final and not subject 1 to review pursuant to chapter 17A . 2 Sec. 23. TREASURER OF STATE. 3 1. There is appropriated from the general fund of the 4 state to the office of treasurer of state for the fiscal year 5 beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, the following 6 amounts, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the 7 purposes designated: 8 a. For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 9 purposes: 10 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,046,415 11 b. For deposit in the administrative fund of the Iowa ABLE 12 savings plan trust created in section 12I.4, for implementation 13 and administration activities of the Iowa ABLE savings plan 14 trust: 15 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 200,000 16 2. The office of treasurer of state shall supply 17 administrative support for the executive council. 18 Sec. 24. TREASURER OF STATE ââ ROAD USE TAX FUND. There 19 is appropriated from the road use tax fund created in section 20 312.1 to the office of treasurer of state for the fiscal year 21 beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, the following 22 amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the 23 purposes designated: 24 For enterprise resource management costs related to the 25 distribution of road use tax fund moneys: 26 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 316,788 27 Sec. 25. IOWA UTILITIES COMMISSION. 28 1. There is appropriated from the commerce revolving fund 29 created in section 546.12 to the Iowa utilities commission for 30 the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 31 2027, the following amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, 32 to be used for the purposes designated: 33 For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 34 purposes: 35 -14- LSB 5009XG (4) 91 sc/ns 14/ 19 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 12,080,831 1 2. The Iowa utilities commission may expend additional 2 moneys, including moneys for additional personnel, if those 3 additional expenditures are actual expenses which exceed the 4 moneys budgeted for utility regulation and the expenditures are 5 fully reimbursable. Before the commission expends or encumbers 6 an amount in excess of the moneys budgeted for regulation, the 7 commission shall first do all of the following: 8 a. Notify the department of management, the legislative 9 services agency, and the legislative fiscal committee of the 10 need for the expenditures. 11 b. File with each of the entities named in paragraph âaâ the 12 legislative and regulatory justification for the expenditures, 13 along with an estimate of the expenditures. 14 Sec. 26. CHARGES ââ IOWA UTILITIES COMMISSION AND 15 DEPARTMENT OF INSURANCE AND FINANCIAL SERVICES. The Iowa 16 utilities commission and each division of the department of 17 insurance and financial services shall include in its charges 18 assessed or revenues generated an amount sufficient to cover 19 the amount stated in its appropriation and any state-assessed 20 indirect costs determined by the department of administrative 21 services. 22 Sec. 27. IOWA PRODUCTS. As a condition of receiving an 23 appropriation, any agency appropriated moneys pursuant to 24 this division of this Act shall give first preference when 25 purchasing a product to an Iowa product or a product produced 26 by an Iowa-based business, and shall give second preference to 27 a United States product or a product produced by a business 28 based in the United States. 29 Sec. 28. LIMITATION OF STANDING APPROPRIATION. 30 Notwithstanding the standing appropriation in the following 31 designated section for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, 32 and ending June 30, 2027, the amount appropriated from the 33 general fund of the state pursuant to that section for the 34 following designated purpose shall not exceed the following 35 -15- LSB 5009XG (4) 91 sc/ns 15/ 19 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ amount: 1 For the enforcement of chapter 453D relating to tobacco 2 product manufacturers under section 453D.8 : 3 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 17,525 4 DIVISION II 5 DEPOSIT OF CERTAIN FEES 6 Sec. 29. Section 10A.519, subsection 3, Code 2026, is 7 amended by adding the following new paragraph: 8 NEW PARAGRAPH . c. The fees collected by the director 9 under this subsection shall be deposited in the licensing and 10 regulation fund created in section 10A.507. 11 Sec. 30. Section 10A.519, subsection 7, Code 2026, is 12 amended to read as follows: 13 7. a. A consumer fireworks fee fund is created in the state 14 treasury under the control of the director. Notwithstanding 15 section 12C.7 , interest or earnings on moneys in the consumer 16 fireworks fee fund shall be credited to the consumer fireworks 17 fee fund. Moneys in the fund are appropriated to the director 18 to be used to fulfill the responsibilities of the director for 19 the administration and enforcement of this section and section 20 10A.520 and to provide grants pursuant to paragraph âbâ . The 21 fund shall include the fees collected by the director under the 22 fee schedule established pursuant to subsection 3 and the fees 23 collected by the director under section 10A.520 for wholesaler 24 registration. 25 b. The director shall establish a local fire protection and 26 emergency medical service providers grant program to provide 27 grants in the following order of priority: 28 (1) a. Local fire protection service providers and 29 local emergency medical service providers to establish or 30 provide fireworks safety education programming to members of 31 the public, and for the purchase of necessary enforcement, 32 protection, or emergency response equipment related to the sale 33 and use of consumer fireworks in this state. 34 (2) b. Local volunteer fire protection service providers 35 -16- LSB 5009XG (4) 91 sc/ns 16/ 19 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ for the purchase of necessary enforcement, protection, or 1 emergency response equipment. 2 Sec. 31. Section 10A.520, subsection 3, Code 2026, is 3 amended to read as follows: 4 3. The director shall establish an annual registration fee 5 of one thousand dollars for wholesalers of consumer fireworks 6 within the state. Registration fees collected pursuant to 7 this section shall be deposited in the consumer fireworks fee 8 fund created in section 10A.519 licensing and regulation fund 9 created in section 10A.507 . 10 Sec. 32. Section 90A.10, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended 11 to read as follows: 12 1. Moneys collected pursuant to section 90A.9 from a 13 professional boxing event are appropriated to the department 14 of inspections, appeals, and licensing and shall be used by 15 the commissioner to award grants to organizations that promote 16 amateur boxing matches in this state deposited in the licensing 17 and regulation fund created in section 10A.507 . All other 18 moneys collected by the commissioner pursuant to this chapter 19 are appropriated to the department of inspections, appeals, and 20 licensing and shall be used by the commissioner to administer 21 this chapter . Section 8.33 applies only to moneys in excess 22 of the first twenty thousand dollars appropriated each fiscal 23 year. 24 Sec. 33. Section 99B.58, Code 2026, is amended to read as 25 follows: 26 99B.58 Electrical or mechanical amusement devices ââ special 27 fund deposit of fees . 28 Fees collected by the department pursuant to sections 29 99B.53 and 99B.56 shall be deposited in a special fund created 30 in the state treasury. Moneys in the fund are appropriated 31 to the department of inspections, appeals, and licensing 32 and the department of public safety for administration and 33 enforcement of this subchapter , including employment of 34 necessary personnel. The distribution of moneys in the fund 35 -17- LSB 5009XG (4) 91 sc/ns 17/ 19 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ to the department of inspections, appeals, and licensing and 1 the department of public safety shall be pursuant to a written 2 policy agreed upon by the departments. Notwithstanding section 3 12C.7, subsection 2 , interest or earnings on moneys deposited 4 in the fund shall be credited to the fund. Notwithstanding 5 section 8.33 , moneys remaining in the fund at the end of a 6 fiscal year shall not revert to the general fund of the state 7 the licensing and regulation fund created in section 10A.507 . 8 Sec. 34. Section 505.7, subsection 3, Code 2026, is amended 9 to read as follows: 10 3. Forty percent of the nonexamination Nonexamination 11 revenues payable to the division of insurance or the department 12 of revenue in connection with the regulation of insurance 13 companies or other entities subject to the regulatory 14 jurisdiction of the division shall be deposited in the commerce 15 revolving fund created in section 546.12 and shall be subject 16 to annual appropriation to the division for its operations 17 and is also subject to expenditure under subsection 6 . The 18 remaining nonexamination revenues payable to the division of 19 insurance or the department of revenue shall be deposited in 20 the general fund of the state. 21 Sec. 35. TRANSFER OF MONEYS. On the effective date of 22 this division of this Act, unencumbered and unobligated moneys 23 remaining in the consumer fireworks fee fund created in section 24 10A.519, Code 2026, and the special fund created in section 25 99B.58, Code 2026, shall be transferred to the licensing and 26 regulation fund created in section 10A.507. 27